Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.0971

Department of children, youth, and families—Certain personnel exempted from chapter.

In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, this chapter does not apply in the department of children, youth, and families to the secretary; the secretary's confidential secretary; deputy, assistant, and regional secretaries, one confidential secretary for each of the aforesaid officers; and any other exempt staff members provided for in chapter 6, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 105.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.